District of Columbia statutes.
6-701.02

Fire escapes — Commercial buildings; access to escapes; hallway and stairway lights.

It shall be the duty of the owner entitled to the beneficial use, rental, or control of any building already erected, or which may hereafter be erected, in which 10 or more persons are employed at the same time in any of the stories above the 2nd story, except 3-story buildings used exclusively as stores or for office purposes, and having at least 2 stairways from the ground floor each 3 or more feet wide and separated from each other by a distance of at least 30 feet, from 1 of which stairways shall be easy access to the roof, to provide and cause to be erected and affixed thereto a sufficient number of the aforesaid fire escapes, the location and number of the same to be determined by the Mayor of the District of Columbia, and to keep the hallways and stairways in every such building as is used and occupied at night properly lighted, to the satisfaction of the Mayor, from sunset to sunrise.

Mar. 19, 1906, 34 Stat. 70, ch. 957, § 2
Mar. 2, 1907, 34 Stat. 1247, ch. 2566
June 4, 1934, 48 Stat. 843, ch. 388

History

This section is referenced in § 6-701.03.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 5-502.
1973 Ed., § 5-302.

Prior Codifications

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.

Change in Government